Texas, session 892, HB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 253, Election Code, is amended by adding Section 253.0342 to read as follows: Sec. 253.0342.  RESTRICTIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS DURING PERIOD WHEN LEGISLATURE HAS NO QUORUM. (a) During a period in which a house of the legislature does not have a quorum present, a member of the legislature or a specific-purpose committee for supporting, opposing, or assisting a member of the legislature: (1)  may not knowingly accept a political contribution during that period; and (2)  shall refuse any political contribution received during that period. (b)  A member of the legislature or a specific-purpose committee for supporting, opposing, or assisting a member of the legislature who receives and refuses a political contribution during the period described by Subsection (a) shall return the contribution to the contributor not later than the 30th day after the date of receipt. (c)  A political contribution made by United States mail or by common or contract carrier is not considered received during that period if the contribution was properly addressed and placed with postage or carrier charges prepaid or prearranged in the mail or delivered to the common or contract carrier before the beginning of the period. The date indicated by the post office cancellation mark or the common or contract carrier documents is considered to be the date the contribution was placed in the mail or delivered to the common or contract carrier unless proven otherwise. SECTION 2.  Section 253.0342, Election Code, as added by this Act, applies only to a political contribution accepted on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.